Utah statutes.
58-71-801.   Disclosure of financial interest by licensee.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (5), licensees under this chapter may not own, directly or indirectly:

(a)  any pharmacy or pharmaceutical facility as defined in Section 58-17b-102; or

(b)  a retail store, wholesaler, distributor, manufacturer, or facility of any other kind located in this state that is engaged in the sale, dispensing, delivery, distribution, or manufacture of homeopathic remedies, dietary supplements, or natural medicines.

(2)  A licensee may own or control less than 5% of the outstanding stock of a corporation whose ownership is prohibited under Subsection (1), if the stock of the corporation is publicly traded.

(3)  Licensees under this chapter may not refer patients, clients, or customers to any clinical laboratory, ambulatory or surgical care facilities, or other treatment or rehabilitation services such as physical therapy, cardiac rehabilitation, or radiology services in which the licensee or a member of the licensee's immediate family has any financial relationship as that term is described in 42 U.S.C.  1395nn, unless the licensee at the time of making the referral discloses that relationship, in writing, to the patient, client, or customer.

(4)  The written disclosure under Subsection (3) shall also state the patient may choose any facility or service center for purpose of having the laboratory work or treatment service performed.

(5)  Licensees under this chapter may sell from their offices homeopathic remedies or dietary supplements as defined in the Federal Food Drug and Cosmetic Act consistent with division rule.

